Utah statutes.
24-2-102.   Grounds for seizing property.

(1)  Property may be seized by a peace officer or any other person authorized by law upon process issued by a court having jurisdiction over the property in accordance with the Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure relating to search warrants or administrative warrants.

(2)  Property may be seized under this chapter when:

(a)  the seizure is incident to an arrest;

(b)  the property seized is the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding under this title; or

(c)  the peace officer or other person authorized by law has probable cause to believe that the property:

(i)  is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety;

(ii)  is evidence of a crime;

(iii)  has been used or was intended to be used to commit a crime; or

(iv)  is proceeds of a crime.



Enacted by Chapter 394, 2013 General Session

